Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1274
Business Development Services Program; created; administration.

There is hereby created the Business Development Services Program in the Existing Business Assistance Division of the Department of Economic Development. The division shall be responsible for the administration of the program and shall have the power and authority to contract for services as provided in sections 81-1275 and 81-1276.

Laws 1987, LB 736, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 639, § 9.